Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 67.1 Uniform Act on Prevention of and Remedies for Human Trafficking

11-67.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Uniform Act on Prevention of and Remedies for Human Trafficking.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Adult” means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Coercion” means:

The use or threat of force against, abduction of, serious harm to, or physical restraint of, an individual;

The use of a plan, pattern, or statement with intent to cause an individual to believe that failure to perform an act will result in the use of force against, abduction of, serious harm to, or physical restraint of, an individual;

The abuse or threatened abuse of law or legal process;

Controlling or threatening to control an individual’s access to a controlled substance as defined in §

21-28-1.02

;

The destruction or taking of or a threatened destruction or taking of an individual’s identification document or other property;

The use of debt bondage;

The use of an individual’s physical or mental impairment when the impairment has a substantial adverse effect on the individual’s cognitive or volitional function; or

The commission of civil or criminal fraud.

“Commercial sexual activity” means sexual activity for which anything of value is given to, promised to, or received, by a person.

“Debt bondage” means inducing an individual to provide:

Commercial sexual activity in payment toward or satisfaction of a real or purported debt; or

Labor or services in payment toward or satisfaction of a real or purported debt if:

The reasonable value of the labor or services is not applied toward the liquidation of the debt; or

The length of the labor or services is not limited and the nature of the labor or services is not defined.

“Human trafficking” means the commission of an offense created by §§

11-67.1-3

—

11-67.1-7

.

“Identification document” means a passport, driver’s license, immigration document, travel document, or other government-issued identification document, including a document issued by a foreign government.

“Labor or services” means activity having economic value.

“Minor” means an individual less than eighteen (18) years of age.

“Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, or other legal entity. The term does not include a public corporation or government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

“Serious harm” means harm, whether physical or nonphysical, including psychological, economic, or reputational, to an individual that would compel a reasonable individual of the same background and in the same circumstances to perform or continue to perform labor or services or sexual activity to avoid incurring the harm.

“Sexual activity” means sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, anal intercourse, or the intentional touching of the victim’s or accused’s intimate body parts, clothed or unclothed, if the touching is for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, or assault. The term includes a sexually-explicit performance.

“Sexually explicit performance” means an act or show, intended to arouse, satisfy the sexual desires of, or appeal to the prurient interests of patrons or viewers, whether public or private, live, photographed, recorded, or videotaped.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

“Victim” means an individual who is subjected to human trafficking or to conduct that would have constituted human trafficking had this chapter been in effect when the conduct occurred, regardless of whether the perpetrator is identified, apprehended, prosecuted, or convicted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-3.
Trafficking an individual.

A person commits the offense of trafficking an individual if the person knowingly recruits, transports, transfers, harbors, receives, provides, obtains, isolates, maintains, or entices an individual in furtherance of:

Forced labor in violation of §

11-67.1-4

; or

Sexual servitude in violation of §

11-67.1-5

.

Every person who shall commit trafficking of a minor shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than fifty (50) years imprisonment, a fine of up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or both.

Every person who shall commit trafficking of an adult shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than twenty (20) years imprisonment, a fine of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-4.
Forced labor.

A person commits the offense of forced labor if the person knowingly uses coercion to compel an individual to provide labor or services, except when such conduct is permissible under federal law or law of this state other than this chapter.

Every person who shall commit forced labor of a minor shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than fifty (50) years imprisonment, a fine of up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or both.

Every person who shall commit forced labor of an adult shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than twenty (20) years imprisonment, a fine of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-5.
Sexual servitude.

A person commits the offense of sexual servitude if the person knowingly:

Maintains or makes available a minor for the purpose of engaging the minor in commercial sexual activity; or

Uses coercion or deception to compel an adult to engage in commercial sexual activity.

It is not a defense in a prosecution under subsection (a)(1) of this section that the minor consented to engage in commercial sexual activity or that the defendant believed the minor was an adult.

Every person who shall commit sexual servitude of a minor shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than fifty (50) years imprisonment, a fine of up to forty thousand dollars ($40,000), or both.

Every person who shall commit sexual servitude of an adult shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than twenty (20) years imprisonment, a fine of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-6.
Patronizing a victim of sexual servitude.

A person commits the offense of patronizing a victim of sexual servitude if the person knowingly gives, agrees to give, or offers to give anything of value so that an individual may engage in commercial sexual activity with another individual and the person knows that the other individual is a victim of sexual servitude.

Every person who shall patronize a minor for purposes of sexual servitude of a minor shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than twenty (20) years imprisonment, a fine of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

Every person who shall patronize an adult for purposes of sexual servitude of an adult shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than ten (10) years imprisonment, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-7.
Patronizing a minor for commercial sexual activity.

A person commits the offense of patronizing a minor for commercial sexual activity if:

With the intent that an individual engage in commercial sexual activity with a minor, the person gives, agrees to give, or offers to give anything of value to a minor or another person so that the individual may engage in commercial sexual activity with a minor; or

The person gives, agrees to give, or offers to give anything of value to a minor or another person so that an individual may engage in commercial sexual activity with a minor.

Every person who shall patronize a minor for purposes of commercial sexual activity with a minor shall be guilty of a felony, subject to not more than ten (10) years imprisonment, a fine of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-8.
Business entity liability.

A person that is a business entity may be prosecuted for an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

—

11-67.1-7

only if:

The entity knowingly engages in conduct that constitutes human trafficking; or

An employee or nonemployee agent of the entity engages in conduct that constitutes human trafficking and the conduct is part of a pattern of activity in violation of this chapter for the benefit of the entity, which the entity knew was occurring and failed to take effective action to stop.

When a person that is a business entity is prosecuted for an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

—

11-67.1-7

, the court may consider the severity of the entity’s conduct and order penalties in addition to those otherwise provided for the offense, including:

A fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per offense;

Disgorgement of profit from activity in violation of this chapter; and

Debarment from state and local government contracts.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-9.
Aggravating circumstance.

An aggravating circumstance during the commission of an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

,

11-67.1-4

, or

11-67.1-5

occurs when:

The defendant recruited, enticed, or obtained the victim of the offense from a shelter that serves individuals subjected to human trafficking, domestic violence, or sexual assault, runaway youth, foster children, or the homeless; or

Kidnaps, holds hostage, or otherwise keeps the victim against his or her will.

Whenever it appears that a person may be subject to the enhanced sentence pursuant to this section, the attorney general, in no case later than the first pretrial conference, shall file with the court a notice specifying that the defendant, upon conviction, is subject to the imposition of sentencing in accordance with this section.

Upon any plea of guilt or nolo contendere, or verdict or finding of guilt of the defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing to determine if evidence of aggravating circumstances exist. At the hearing, the court shall permit the attorney general and the defense counsel to present additional evidence to the jury relevant to the determination of whether aggravating circumstances exist. If the jury at the hearing, or in the case of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere the court at sentencing, determines beyond a reasonable doubt that aggravating circumstances exist, they shall be sentenced as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

If the trier of fact finds that an aggravating circumstance occurred during the commission of an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

,

11-67.1-4

, or

11-67.1-5

, the defendant may be imprisoned for up to five (5) years in addition to the period of imprisonment prescribed for the offense. Any such sentence may run consecutively to any other sentence imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-10.
Restitution.

The court shall order a person convicted of an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

,

11-67.1-4

, or

11-67.1-5

to pay restitution to the victim of the offense for:

Expenses incurred or reasonably certain to be incurred by the victim as a result of the offense, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs; and

An amount equal to the greatest of the following, with no reduction for expenses the defendant incurred to maintain the victim:

The gross income to the defendant for, or the value to the defendant of, the victim’s labor or services or sexual activity;

The amount the defendant contracted to pay the victim; or

The value of the victim’s labor or services or sexual activity, calculated under the minimum-wage and overtime provisions of the “Fair Labor Standards Act,” 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq., or subsection (a)(2) of this section, whichever is greater, even if the provisions do not apply to the victim’s labor or services or sexual activity.

The court shall order restitution under subsection (a) of this section even if the victim is unavailable to accept payment of restitution.

If the victim does not claim restitution ordered under subsection (a) of this section for five (5) years after entry of the order, the restitution must be paid to the criminal injuries compensation fund, as established in chapter 25 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-11.
Forfeiture.

On motion, the court shall order a person convicted of an offense under §§

11-67.1-3

,

11-67.1-4

, or

11-67.1-5

to forfeit any interest in real or personal property that:

Was used or intended to be used to commit or facilitate the commission of the offense; or

Constitutes proceeds or was derived from proceeds that the person obtained, directly or indirectly, as a result of the offense.

In a proceeding against real or personal property under this section, the person convicted of the offense may assert a defense that the forfeiture is manifestly disproportional to the seriousness of the offense. The person has the burden to establish the defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

Proceeds from the public sale or auction of property forfeited under subsection (a) of this section must be distributed in the manner provided for the distribution of the proceeds of criminal forfeitures act pursuant to §§

21-28-5.04.1

and

21-28-5.04.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-12.
Statute of limitations.

A prosecution for an offense under this chapter must be commenced not later than ten (10) years after commission of the offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-13.
Victim confidentiality.

In an investigation of or a prosecution for an offense under this chapter, every agency of state or local government shall keep confidential the identity, pictures, and images of the alleged victim and the family of the alleged victim, except to the extent that disclosure is:

Necessary for the purpose of investigation or prosecution;

Required by law or court order; or

Necessary to ensure provision of services or benefits to the victim or the victim’s family.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-14.
Past sexual behavior of victim.

In a prosecution for an offense under this chapter or a civil action under §

11-67.1-18

, evidence of a specific instance of the alleged victim’s past sexual behavior or reputation, or opinion evidence of past sexual behavior of the alleged victim, is not admissible unless the evidence is:

Admitted in accordance with §

11-37-13

; or

Offered by the prosecution to prove a pattern of human trafficking by the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-15.
Immunity of minor.

An individual is not criminally liable or subject to a delinquency proceeding in the family court for prostitution or solicitation to commit a sexual act if the individual was a minor at the time of the offense and committed the offense as a direct result of being a victim.

An individual who has engaged in commercial sexual activity is not criminally liable or subject to a delinquency proceeding in the family court for prostitution or solicitation to commit a sexual act if the individual was a minor at the time of the offense.

A minor who under subsection (a) or (b) of this section is not subject to criminal liability or a delinquency proceeding in family court is presumed to be an abused and/or neglected child as defined in §

40-11-2

.

This section does not apply in a prosecution or a delinquency proceeding for patronizing a prostitute.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-16.
Affirmative defense of victim.

An individual charged with prostitution or solicitation to commit a sexual act, committed as a direct result of being a victim, may assert an affirmative defense that the individual is a victim.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-17.
Motion to vacate and expunge conviction.

An individual convicted of prostitution or solicitation to commit a sexual act, committed as a direct result of being a victim, may apply by motion to the court having jurisdiction over the offense to vacate the conviction and seal or expunge the record of conviction. The court may grant the motion after a hearing and upon a finding that the individual’s participation in the offense was a direct result of being a victim.

An official determination or documentation from a federal, state, local, or tribal agency that the individual was a victim at the time of the offense creates a presumption that the individual’s participation was a direct result of being a victim.

A motion filed under subsection (a) of this section, any hearing conducted on the motion, and any relief granted shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of §§

12-1-12

,

12-1-12

.1, and

12-1-12.2

, or chapter 1.3 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-18.
Civil action.

A victim may bring a civil action against a person who or that commits an offense against the victim under §§

11-67.1-3

,

11-67.1-4

, or

11-67.1-5

for compensatory damages, punitive damages, injunctive relief, and any other appropriate relief.

If a victim prevails in an action under this section, the court shall award the victim reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

An action under this section must be commenced not later than ten (10) years after the later of the date on which the victim:

No longer was subject to human trafficking; or

Attained eighteen (18) years of age.

Damages awarded to a victim under this section for an item must be offset by any restitution paid to the victim pursuant to §

11-67.1-10

.

This section does not preclude any other remedy available to a victim under federal law or other general or public law of this state other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-19.
Council on human trafficking.

The council on human trafficking is created in the executive branch. The governor shall appoint the chair and members of the council. Members must include representatives of:

Department of the attorney general, the department of health, the department of children, youth and families, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and law enforcement, that have contact with victims or perpetrators;

Nongovernmental organizations that represent, advocate for, or provide services to victims; and

Other organizations and individuals, including victims, whose expertise would benefit the council.

The state agencies represented on the council created under this section shall provide staff to the council.

The council created under this section shall meet on a regular basis and:

Develop a coordinated and comprehensive plan to provide victims with services;

Collect and evaluate data on human trafficking in this state and submit an annual report to the governor and legislature;

Promote public awareness about human trafficking, victim remedies and services, and trafficking prevention;

Create a public awareness sign that contains the state and national human trafficking resource center hotline information;

Coordinate training on human trafficking prevention and victim services for state and local employees who may have recurring contact with victims or perpetrators; and

Conduct other appropriate activities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-20.
Display of public-awareness sign — Penalty for failure to display.

Any public or quasi-public transportation agency shall display a public-awareness sign that contains the state and national human trafficking resource center hotline information in every transportation station, rest area, and welcome center in the state that is open to the public.

An employer shall display the public-awareness sign described in subsection (a) of this section in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to employees and the public at each of the following locations in this state at which the employer has employees:

A strip club or other sexually-oriented business;

A business entity previously found to be a nuisance for prostitution;

A job-recruitment center;

A hospital; or

An emergency-care provider.

The department of labor and training shall impose a fine of three hundred dollars ($300) per violation on an employer that knowingly fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section. The fine shall be the exclusive remedy for failure to comply.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-21.
Eligibility for benefit or service.

A victim is eligible for a benefit or service available through the state in any plan established by the council on human trafficking [and identified in the plan developed under §

11-67.1-19(c)(1)

], including compensation under the criminal injuries compensation act pursuant to chapter 25 of title 12, regardless of immigration status.

A minor who has engaged in commercial sexual activity is eligible for a benefit or service available through the state in any plan established by the council on human trafficking, regardless of immigration status.

As soon as practicable after a first encounter with an individual who reasonably appears to any state or local agency to be a victim or a minor who has engaged in commercial sexual activity, the agency shall notify the department of attorney general, a state or local law enforcement agency, or the department of health that the individual may be eligible for a benefit or service pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-22.
Law enforcement protocol.

On request from an individual whom a law enforcement officer or agent thereof reasonably believes is a victim who is, or has been, subjected to a severe form of trafficking or criminal offense required for the individual to qualify for a nonimmigrant T or U visa under 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(T), or 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(U), or for continued presence under 22 U.S.C. § 7105(c)(3), the law enforcement officer, as soon as practicable after receiving the request, shall complete, sign, and give to the individual the Form I-914B or Form I-918B provided by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services on its Internet website and request assistance from the local Immigration and Naturalization office.

If the law enforcement agency or officer determines that an individual does not meet the requirements for the agency to comply with subsection (a) of this section, the agency shall inform the individual of the reason and that the individual may make another request under subsection (a) of this section and submit additional evidence satisfying the requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-23.
Grant to or contract with service provider.

To the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose, the council on human trafficking may make a grant to, or contract with, a unit of state or local government or nongovernmental victim’s service organization to develop or expand service programs for victims.

A recipient of a grant or contract under subsection (a) of this section shall report annually to the council on human trafficking the number and demographic information of all victims receiving services under the grant or contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-24.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-25.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.

11-67.1-26.
Effect of repeal on criminal prosecutions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “event” means and includes any conduct, investigation, suit, prosecution, complaint, information, or indictment related to violations committed before the date of repeal of chapter 67 of title 11.

No event occurring or committed under chapter 67 of title 11, as repealed, shall in any case be affected by the repeal.

All of the events may be proceeded with pursuant to chapter 67 of title 11, which shall be deemed to be in force for the purpose of prosecuting any of the events to final judgment and execution or sentence, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 2.